hunspell-dic-builder/data/mg/mg_MG.aff
SET UTF-8

FLAG long

TRY esianrtoldgmphbyfvkzESIANRTOLDGMPHBYFVKZ'-

MAP 21
MAP aàâäAÀÂÄ
MAP eéèêëEÉÈÊË
MAP iîïyIÎÏY
MAP oôöOÔÖ
MAP bB
MAP dD
MAP fF
MAP gG
MAP hH
MAP jJ
MAP kK
MAP lL
MAP mM
MAP nN
MAP pP
MAP rR
MAP sS
MAP tT
MAP vV
MAP zZ
MAP yY

BREAK 7
BREAK -
BREAK .
BREAK ·
BREAK ^'
BREAK ^‘
BREAK '$
BREAK ’$

REP 6
REP p mp
REP mp p
REP nt t
REP t nt
REP ina$ ana
REP ana$ ina

PFX VO N 1
PFX VO 0 voa .

PFX FI Y 1
PFX FI 0 fi .

PFX FA Y 1
PFX FA n f .
PFX FA h f .

SFX VA Y 1
SFX VA 0 va .

SFX HV N 1
SFX HV 0 h .
SFX HV 0 ho .

SFX IN N 2
SFX IN 0 ina [^y]
SFX IN y ina y

SFX AN Y 2
SFX AN 0 na a
SFX AN 0 ana [^a]
