hunspell-dic-builder/data/mg/mg_MG.dic
nanao/FAVAAN
hanao/FAVAAN
manao/VA
anarana/FIAN
tsara/FIAN
ofana/FIAN
tonga/VA
efa/VO
dona/VO
kapa/VOIN
lavo/VO
hidy/VOIN
daka/VOIN
solo/VOIN
sola/VOIN
daroka/VO
